Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2115.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 9HEALTH CARE ANTITRUSTSec.901. Legislative intent.902. Definitions.903. Premerger notification regarding health care.904. Enforcement by Office of Attorney General.905. Measurement of damages.906. Agency cooperation.907. Action not barred as affecting or involving interstate or foreign commerce.123456789101112131415161718 908. Construction.909. Remedies cumulative.§ 901. Legislative intent.The following shall apply:(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that competition beneficial to consumers in health care markets across this Commonwealth remains vigorous and robust.(2) The General Assembly intends to provide the Office of Attorney General with notice of all material health care transactions in this Commonwealth so that the Office of Attorney General has the information necessary to determine whether an investigation under this chapter is warranted for potential anticompetitive conduct and consumer harm.(3) This chapter is intended to supplement the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act by requiring notice of health care transactions not reportable under the reporting thresholds of the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act and by providing the Office of Attorney General with a copy of filings made in accordance with the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act.§ 902. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Acquisition." An agreement, arrangement or activity, the consummation of which results in a person acquiring, directly or indirectly, the control of another person or the ability to influence the competitive conduct of the target person, and includes the acquisition of voting securities and noncorporate interests, such as assets, capital stock, membership interests or equity interests.20260HB2115PN2754 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Contracting affiliation." The formation of a relationship between two or more persons that permits the persons to negotiate jointly with insurers or third-party administrators over rates for professional medical services or for one person to negotiate on behalf of the other person with insurers or third-party administrators over rates for professional medical services."Hart-Scott-Rodino Act." Title II of the Clayton Antitrust Act (Public Law 63-212, 15 U.S.C. § 18a)."Health care facility." As defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Health care facility system." Either of the following:(1) a parent corporation of one or more health care facilities and a person affiliated with the parent corporation through ownership or control; or(2) a health care facility and a person affiliated with the health care facility through direct or indirect ownership, including a private equity fund."Health care practitioner." As defined in section 103 of the Health Care Facilities Act."Health care services." Medical, surgical, chiropractic, hospital, optometric, dental treatment, podiatric, pharmaceutical, ambulance, mental health, substance use disorder, therapeutic, preventative, diagnostic, curative, rehabilitative, palliative, custodial and other services relating to the prevention, cure or treatment of illness, injury or disease."Health care services revenue." The total revenue received for health care services in the previous 12 months.20260HB2115PN2754 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Insurer." As defined in 40 Pa.C.S. § 9103 (relating to definitions)."Material change." As follows:(1) A merger, acquisition or contracting affiliation between two or more persons of the following types:(i) Health care facilities.(ii) Health care facility systems.(iii) Provider organizations.(2) The term includes:(i) A proposed change that is a health care transaction that results in a merger, acquisition or contracting affiliation between a Pennsylvania person and an out-of-State person where the out-of-State person generates at least $10,000,000 in health care services revenue from patients residing in this Commonwealth and the persons are of the types identified in paragraph (1).(ii) A merger, acquisition or contracting affiliation between two or more health care facilities, health care facility systems or provider organizations only qualifies as a material change if the health care facilities, health care facility systems or provider organizations did not previously have common ownership or a contracting affiliation."Merger." A consolidation of two or more persons, including two or more persons joining through a common parent organization or two or more organizations forming a new organization. The term does not include a corporate reorganization."Monopoly." The power to control prices and exclude competition as a seller."Provider organization." A corporation, partnership, 20260HB2115PN2754 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 business trust, association or organized group of persons, whether incorporated or not, that is in the business of health care delivery or management and that represents two or more health care practitioners in contracting with insurers or third-party administrators for the payments of health care services. The term includes a physician organization, physician-hospital organization, independent practice association, provider network and accountable care organization."Third-party administrator." A person that administers payments for health care services on behalf of a client in exchange for an administrative fee.§ 903. Premerger notification regarding health care.(a) Notification.--A person conducting business in this Commonwealth that is required to file the notification and report form for certain mergers and acquisitions under the Hart- Scott-Rodino Act shall provide the same notice and documentation in its entirety to the Office of Attorney General at the same time that notice is filed with the Federal Trade Commission or the United States Department of Justice.(b) Notice of material change.--Not less than 120 days prior to the effective date of a health care transaction that results in a material change, the parties to the health care transaction shall submit written notice to the Office of Attorney General of the material change.(c) Notice requirements.--(1) The written notice provided by the parties under subsection (b) shall include:(i) The names of the parties and the parties' current business addresses.(ii) Identification of all locations where health 20260HB2115PN2754 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care services are currently provided by each party.(iii) Identification of all health care practitioners who currently provide health care services for each party.(iv) A brief description of the nature and purpose of the proposed material change.(v) The anticipated effective date of the proposed material change.(2) A health care facility, health care facility system, health care practitioner or provider organization conducting business in this Commonwealth that files a premerger notification with the Federal Trade Commission or the United States Department of Justice, in compliance with the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act, shall provide a copy of the filing to the Office of Attorney General.(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the parties to a material change from voluntarily providing additional information to the Office of Attorney General.(d) Requests for additional information.--(1) The Office of Attorney General shall make a request for additional information from the parties under this chapter within 30 days of the date of notice.(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude the Office of Attorney General from conducting an investigation or enforcing Federal or State antitrust laws at a later date.(e) Materials submitted to the Office of Attorney General.--(1) Information submitted to the Office of Attorney General under this section shall be maintained and used by 20260HB2115PN2754 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Office of Attorney General as provided under this chapter.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the Office of Attorney General under this chapter.(3) Failure of the Office of Attorney General to comply with this section does not provide a private cause of action.(f) Penalty for noncompliance.--A person that fails to comply with this section is liable to the Commonwealth for a civil penalty of not more than $200 per day for each day of noncompliance.§ 904. Enforcement by Office of Attorney General.(a) Action on behalf of Commonwealth.--If the Office of Attorney General has reason to believe that a person, foreign or domestic, has engaged in, is engaging in or is about to engage in an act or practice that is unlawful under this chapter, the Office of Attorney General may bring a civil action in the name of the Commonwealth against the person to:(1) Obtain a declaratory judgment that the act or practice violates this chapter.(2) Enjoin an act or practice that violates this chapter by issuing a temporary restraining order, an ex parte temporary restraining order or a preliminary or permanent injunction, without bond.(3) Recover a civil penalty of not less than $100,000 for each violation of this chapter or of an injunction, judgment or consent agreement issued or entered into under this chapter.(4) Obtain an order requiring divestiture of assets:(i) Acquired in violation of this chapter and after 20260HB2115PN2754 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a court determines that divestiture is necessary to avoid the creation or continuation of a monopoly or to avoid a likely substantial lessening of competition that results from a transaction found to be in violation of this chapter.(ii) To restore competition to a line of commerce that has been eliminated by a violation of this chapter.(5) Recover actual damages, restitution or disgorgement on behalf of the Commonwealth and Commonwealth agencies injured either directly or indirectly through a violation of this chapter.(b) Action on behalf of individual.--The Office of Attorney General may bring a civil action in the name of the Commonwealth on behalf of an individual injured directly or indirectly to recover damages, restitution or disgorgement through a violation of this chapter.(c) Recovery authorized.--The Office of Attorney General shall recover the costs of an investigation, expert costs and reasonable attorney fees and costs if successful in an action initiated under this section.(d) Jurisdiction.--A civil action under this section may be brought by the Office of Attorney General in Commonwealth Court or in the court of common pleas of the county in which a party resides or has a principal place of business.(e) Investigation.--The Office of Attorney General may:(1) Initiate an investigation if the Office of Attorney General has reason to believe that a person, whether foreign or domestic, has engaged in or is engaging in a violation of this chapter or of a Federal antitrust law that may be enforced by the Office of Attorney General.20260HB2115PN2754 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses and documentary material and propound interrogatories to be answered in writing under oath and collect evidence.(3) Use the information obtained under this section as necessary in the civil enforcement of this chapter or Federal antitrust law that may be enforced by the Office of Attorney General, including presentation before a court.(4) Cooperate with and coordinate enforcement of this chapter and Federal antitrust laws, that may be enforced by the Office of Attorney General, with the Federal Government, the several states and state agencies, including using and sharing information and evidence obtained under this chapter.(f) Presumptions.--In an action brought by the Office of Attorney General under this chapter and the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act:(1) The Office of Attorney General is the sole party for discovery purposes and is deemed to lack possession, custody or control over documents possessed by the General Assembly, other Commonwealth officers or other Commonwealth agencies.(2) If the action is asserted on behalf of a Commonwealth agency, the Office of Attorney General may facilitate nonparty discovery from the Commonwealth agency but is not otherwise obligated under section 906 (relating to agency cooperation) or section 208 of the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(3) If the Office of Attorney General does not seek to recover damages for an injury suffered by a Commonwealth agency, nonparty discovery of the Commonwealth agency is presumptively unreasonable and unduly burdensome.20260HB2115PN2754 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 905. Measurement of damages.(a) Prevailing plaintiff.--In an action brought under this chapter in which the plaintiff prevails, the prevailing plaintiff shall recover treble damages sustained, reasonable attorney fees and costs, expert witness fees and investigative costs.(b) Method.--In an action under this chapter, damages may be proved and assessed in the aggregate by statistical or sampling methods, by the computation of illegal overcharges or underpayment or by another reasonable system of estimating aggregate damages as the court may permit without the necessity of separately proving the individual claim of, or amount of damage to, persons on whose behalf the suit was brought.(c) Interest.--Damages for injuries by reason of anything prohibited under this chapter shall include interest computed from the date on which the injury is sustained, at a rate equal to the statutory rate for postjudgment interest, and the cost of suit, including reasonable attorney fees.§ 906. Agency cooperation.(a) Duties of Commonwealth agencies.--All Commonwealth agencies shall assist the Office of Attorney General in the enforcement of this chapter, if requested, and shall promptly comply with any request for documents, testimony or information.(b) Attorney General.--The Office of Attorney General shall provide notice to:(1) The Department of Health of any enforcement action initiated under section 904 (relating to enforcement by Office of Attorney General) as well as the resolution of any action initiated under section 904 that involves a health care facility or health care facility system.20260HB2115PN2754 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The Insurance Department of any enforcement action initiated under section 904 as well as the resolution of any action initiated under section 904 that involves an insurer.§ 907. Action not barred as affecting or involving interstate or foreign commerce.An action under this chapter may not be barred on the grounds that the activity or conduct complained of affects or involves interstate or foreign commerce.§ 908. Construction.This chapter shall be construed in harmony with judicial interpretations of comparable Federal antitrust statutes insofar as practicable.§ 909. Remedies cumulative.The remedies afforded by this chapter are cumulative.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2115PN2754 - 11 - 123456789101112131415